New York, session 2025-2026, S4899.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 21 of section 2.10 of the criminal procedure 2 law is amended by adding a new paragraph g to read as follows: 3 g. Court reporters and senior court reporters of the unified court 4 system, provided, however, that nothing in this paragraph shall be 5 deemed to authorize such employees to carry, possess, repair or dispose 6 of a firearm unless the appropriate license therefor has been issued 7 pursuant to section 400.00 of the penal law. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05845-01-5